Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB766.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 502.060 is amended to read as follows:
A person is criminally liable for conduct constituting an offense which he or she
performs or causes to be performed in the name of or in behalf of a corporation to the
same extent as if the conduct were performed in his or her own name or behalf.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/19/2025 2:04 PM Jacketed